Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. General Provisions
§ 35-11-104.
Department of environmental quality created.

There is created a department within the executive branch entitled “The State Department of Environmental Quality” as provided in W.S.

9-2-2013

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.4; Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

§ 35-11-105.
Divisions enumerated.

The department shall consist of the following divisions:

Air quality division;

Water quality division;

Land quality division;

Solid and hazardous waste management division;

Abandoned mine land division;

Industrial siting division.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.5; Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-11-106.
Powers, duties, functions and regulatory authority.

All powers, duties, functions and regulatory authority vested in the state office of industrial siting administration are transferred to the department, as of April 1, 1992. The performance of such acts or functions by the industrial siting division of the department shall have the same effect as if done by the former state office of industrial siting administration as referred to or designated by law, contract or other document. The reference or designation to the former state office of industrial siting administration shall now apply to the industrial siting division of the department. The industrial siting council shall retain all powers, duties, functions and regulatory authority but shall be within the department.

All rules, regulations and orders of the former state office of industrial siting administration, the industrial siting council, abandoned mine reclamation program, solid waste management program or any other program or entity transferred to the department by this act which were lawfully adopted prior to April 1, 1992 are adopted as the rules, regulations and orders of the department and shall continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed or nullified pursuant to law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.6; Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-107.
Transfer of funds, records, property and personnel.

All records, physical property and personnel including their rights and privileges under the merit system, retirement system and personnel system, and any appropriated or unused funds of the former state office of industrial siting administration and of the industrial siting council shall be transferred to the department as of the effective date of this act. All records, lists or other information which by law are confidential or privileged in nature shall remain as such.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 4.

The industrial siting division is the successor to the powers, duties, functions and regulatory authority of the state office of industrial siting administration which is abolished effective April 1, 1992.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.7; Laws 1992, ch. 60, §§ 3, 4.

Editor's notes. —

Section 5, ch. 250, Laws 1973, makes the act effective on July 1, 1973.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-108.
Appointment of director and division administrators; qualifications of director; term; salaries; employment of assistants.

The governor with the advice and consent of the senate shall appoint a director of the department who is the department’s executive and administrative head. The director shall possess technical qualifications and administrative and other experience sufficient to fulfill the duties of his position. The director shall appoint administrators for each of the divisions of abandoned mine land, industrial siting, solid and hazardous waste management, air quality, water quality and land quality, who are the executive and administrative heads of their respective divisions. The administrators shall serve at the pleasure of the director and are responsible to and under the control and supervision of the director. The salary and qualifications of each administrator shall be determined by the human resources division. The director, with the advice of the respective administrators, may employ professional, technical and other assistants, along with other employees as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this act. The governor may remove the director as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.8; Laws 1982, ch. 73, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 1997, ch. 178, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Stated

in

Wyo. Outdoor Council v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2010 WY 20, 225 P.3d 1054,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Feb. 25, 2010).

§ 35-11-109.
Powers and duties of director.

In addition to any other powers and duties imposed by law, the director of the department shall:

Perform any and all acts necessary to promulgate, administer and enforce the provisions of this act and any rules, regulations, orders, limitations, standards, requirements or permits adopted, established or issued thereunder, and to exercise all incidental powers as necessary to carry out the purposes of this act;

Advise, consult and cooperate with other agencies of the state, the federal government, other states, interstate agencies, and other persons in furtherance of the purposes of this act;

Exercise the powers and duties conferred and imposed by this act in such a manner as to carry out the policy stated in W.S.

35-11-102

;

Conduct, encourage, request and participate in, studies, surveys, investigations, research, experiments, training and demonstrations by contract, grant or otherwise; prepare and require permittees to prepare reports and install, use and maintain any monitoring equipment or methods reasonably necessary for compliance with the provisions of this act; and collect information and disseminate to the public such information as is deemed reasonable and necessary for the proper enforcement of this act;

Conduct programs of continuing surveillance and of a regular periodic inspection of all actual or potential sources of pollution and of public water supplies with the assistance of the administrators;

Designate authorized officers, employees or representatives of the department to enter and inspect any property, premise or place, except private residences, on or at which an air, water or land pollution source is located or is being constructed or installed, or any premises in which any records required to be maintained by a surface coal mining permittee are located. Persons so designated may inspect and copy any records during normal office hours, and inspect any monitoring equipment or method of operation required to be maintained pursuant to this act at any reasonable time upon presentation of appropriate credentials, and without delay, for the purpose of investigating actual or potential sources of air, water or land pollution and for determining compliance or noncompliance with this act, and any rules, regulations, standards, permits or orders promulgated hereunder. For surface coal mining operations, right of entry to or inspection of any operation, premises, records or equipment shall not require advance notice. The owner, occupant or operator shall receive a duplicate copy of all reports made as a result of such inspections within thirty (30) days. The department shall reimburse any operator for the reasonable costs incurred in producing copies of the records requested by the department under this section;

Investigate violations of this act or regulations adopted hereunder and prepare and present enforcement cases before the council; to take such enforcement action as set out in articles 6 and 7 of this act; to appear before the council on any hearing under this act;

Represent Wyoming in any matters pertaining to plans, procedures or negotiations for interstate compacts or other intergovernmental arrangements relating to environmental enhancement and protection. The director shall cooperate and participate in the negotiation and execution of consent orders, permit issuance, site investigations and remedial measures by and between federal agencies and the owners or operators of Wyoming facilities where the department has not been delegated the authority to administer and enforce federal legislation;

Accept, receive and administer any grants, gifts, loans or other funds made available from any source for the purposes of this act. Any monies received by the director pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited with the state treasurer in the account or fund as provided by law for the purpose designated;

Serve as advisor to the council, without vote, on all matters other than the consideration of rules proposed by the department or contested case proceedings in which the department is a party;

Designate authorized officers, employees or representatives of the department to monitor the air, water, and land quality, and solid waste management operations of all facilities which have been granted permits under W.S.

35-12-101

through

35-12-119

, for assuring continuing compliance with conditions and requirements of their permits and for discovering and preventing noncompliance with the permits or violations of law;

Exercise all the powers granted to administrators by W.S.

35-11-110

;

Issue, deny, amend, suspend or revoke permits and licenses and determine the amount of bonds to be posted by the operator to insure reclamation of any affected lands;

Exercise the powers and duties conferred and imposed by this act. Any person who generates, stores, treats, transports, disposes of or otherwise handles or has handled hazardous wastes shall, upon request, furnish information relating to the wastes and permit at all reasonable times the director or designated officers, employees or representatives of the department to have access to, and to copy all records relating to the wastes. For purposes of developing or assisting in the development of any hazardous waste regulation or enforcing the hazardous waste provisions of this act, the designated officers, employees or representatives are authorized to:

Enter at reasonable times any establishment, property, premise or other place where hazardous wastes are or have been generated, stored, treated, disposed of or transported from; and

Inspect and obtain samples from any person of the wastes and samples of any containers or labeling for the wastes.

Commence and complete with reasonable promptness each inspection conducted under paragraph (xiv) of this subsection. If an officer, employee or representative acting pursuant to paragraph (xiv) of this subsection, obtains any samples, prior to leaving the premises, he shall give to the owner, operator or agent in charge a receipt describing the sample obtained and if requested a portion of each sample equal in volume or weight to the portion retained. If any analysis is made of the samples, a copy of the results of the analysis shall be furnished promptly to the owner, operator or agent in charge.

In addition to any other powers and duties imposed by law, the director of the department may allow the permitting and reporting requirements of this act to be conducted electronically as provided by the Uniform Electronic Transaction Act, W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

and any applicable federal electronic requirements.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.9; Laws 1977, ch. 66, § 2; 1980, ch. 64, § 2; 1988, ch. 53, § 1; 1989, ch. 148, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 1995, ch. 139, § 1; 2005, ch. 29, § 1; ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by chapter 29, § 1, added (b).

Laws 2005, ch. 29, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “law” for “the funds consolidation act” in (a)(ix), and made stylistic changes.

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments by both 2005 acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout subsection (a), see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

This section and §

35-11-112

discuss general powers and responsibilities of director and council respectively,

and are general provisions which provide authority for the promulgation of regulations and standards “necessary,” and not on an assembly-line basis which would cause an undesirable inflexibility in the agency's functioning and impair its ability to deal with specialized problems. Torrington v. Environmental Quality Council, 557 P.2d 1143,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1976).

Warrantless inspection unconstitutional. —

Warrantless inspection of an oil company's underground storage tanks under subsection (a)(vi) violated the company's fourth amendment rights, because this section does not provide a constitutionally adequate substitute for a warrant. V-1 Oil Co. v. Wyoming, Dep't of Environment Quality, 902 F.2d 1482, 1990 U.S. App. LEXIS 6710 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 498 U.S. 920, 111 S. Ct. 295, 112 L. Ed. 2d 249, 1990 U.S. LEXIS 5247 (U.S. 1990).

EQC and DEQ were proper parties to a proceeding challenging new water quality rules. —

After the Wyoming Environmental Quality Council (EQC) adopted proposed revisions to Chapter 1 of the Wyoming Water Quality Rules and Regulations, petitioner special interest groups filed a petition to challenge the new rules and named the Wyoming Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) as respondent; the district court erred in dismissing the petition for lack of jurisdiction on the ground that the EQC was not named in the petition. The Supreme Court of Wyoming, held that both the EQC and the DEQ were both proper parties to this proceeding under the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

35-11-101

through

35-11-1904

; the director of the DEQ had a duty under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-11-109(a)(i) to enforce the provisions of the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act and any rules adopted thereunder.
Wyo. Outdoor Council v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2010 WY 20, 225 P.3d 1054,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2010).

Applied

in

Powder River Basin Resource Council v. Babbitt, 834 F. Supp. 358, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14136 (D. Wyo. 1993).

Quoted

in

Rocky Mt. Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State, 645 P.2d 1163,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Hermes Consol., Inc. v. People, 849 P.2d 1302,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Citizen's action against administrator of environmental protection agency to compel performance of nondiscretionary duty under § 505(a)(2) of federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (33 USC § 1365(a)(2)), 57 ALR Fed 851.

Private contractor as “authorized representative” of administrator of environmental protection agency for purpose of inspections conducted under § 114 of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7414), 72 ALR Fed 176.

§ 35-11-110.
Powers of administrators of the divisions.

The administrators of the air quality, land quality and water quality divisions, under the control and supervision of the director, shall enforce and administer this act and the rules, regulations and standards promulgated hereunder. Each administrator shall have the following powers:

To serve as executive secretary of their respective advisory boards without vote;

To make recommendations to the director regarding the issuance, denial, amendment, suspension or revocation of permits and licenses and to make recommendations to the director regarding the amount of bond to be posted by the operator to insure reclamation of any affected lands;

To supervise studies, surveys, investigations, experiments and research projects assigned by the director and report all information gained therefrom to the director and the appropriate advisory board;

To determine the degrees of air, water or land pollution throughout the state and the several parts thereof;

To administer, in accordance with this act, any permit or certification systems which may be established hereunder;

To require the owners and operators of any point source to complete plans and specifications for any application for a permit required by this act or regulations made pursuant hereto and require the submission of such reports regarding actual or potential violations of this act or regulations thereunder;

To require the owner or operator of any point source to:

Establish and maintain records;

Make reports;

Install, use and maintain monitoring equipment or methods;

Sample effluents, discharges or emissions;

Provide such other information as may be reasonably required and specified.

To consult with and report to the appropriate advisory board and to make written reports of all the activities of his division to said advisory board at each of its regularly scheduled meetings;

To recommend to the director, after consultation with the appropriate advisory board, that any rule, regulation or standard or any amendment adopted hereunder may differ in its terms and provisions as between particular types, characteristics, quantities, conditions and circumstances of air, water or land pollution and its duration, as between particular air, water and land pollution services and as between particular areas of the state;

To possess such further powers as shall be reasonably necessary and incidental to the proper performance of the duties imposed upon the divisions under this act.

The administrator of the land quality division shall have, in addition to the powers set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the power to issue, deny, amend, suspend or revoke licenses and to determine the amount of bonds to be posted by an operator to insure reclamation of affected lands in accordance with the specific authority granted the administrator under article 4 of this act.

The administrator of the solid and hazardous waste management division shall have the powers set forth in paragraphs (a)(ii) through (x) of this section.

The administrator of the abandoned mine land division shall enforce and administer the provisions of W.S.

35-11-1201

through

35-11-1209

and

35-11-1301

through

35-11-1304

. He shall have the powers set forth in paragraph (a)(x) of this section.

The administrator of the industrial siting division shall enforce and administer the provisions of W.S.

35-12-101

through

35-12-119

. He shall have the powers set forth in paragraph (a)(x) of this section.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.10; Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (d), substituted “35-11-1209” for “35-11-1208.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a) and (b), see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Stated

in

Wyo. Outdoor Council v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2010 WY 20, 225 P.3d 1054,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Feb. 25, 2010).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Transporter liability under § 107(a)(4) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USC § 9607(a)(4)), 112 ALR Fed 49.

§ 35-11-111.
Independent environmental quality council created; removal; terms; officers; meetings; expenses.

There is created as a separate operating agency of state government an independent council consisting of seven (7) members to be known as the environmental quality council. Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the members shall be of the same political party. Council members shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor may remove any council member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. No employee of the state, other than employees of institutions of higher education, shall be a member of the council. At all times, there shall be at least one (1) member from the minerals industry and one (1) member from agriculture. Any member receiving more than ten percent (10%) of his income from any permit applicant shall not act on a permit application from that applicant.

The terms of the members shall be for four (4) years, except that on the initial appointment, members’ terms shall be as follows: three (3) shall serve for two (2) years, two (2) shall serve for three (3) years and two (2) shall serve for four (4) years, as designated by the initial appointment. If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint a new member as provided in W.S.

28-12-101

.

The first meeting of the council shall be held within sixty (60) days after the effective date of this act at which time a chairman shall be elected from among the members to serve a one (1) year term. The council shall also annually elect from its membership a vice-chairman and a secretary, each for a term of one (1) year, and it shall keep a record of its proceedings.

The council shall hold at least four (4) regularly scheduled meetings each year. Special meetings may be called by the chairman, and special meetings shall be called by the chairman, upon a written request submitted by the director or three (3) or more members. Four (4) members participating in a matter shall constitute a quorum. All matters shall be decided by a majority vote of those members participating in the matter. For purposes of voting, a member who has recused himself from a matter, a member who is absent and is not participating in the meeting, a member who is unable to participate in proceedings due to illness or incapacity and a vacant position on the council shall be deemed to be not participating in the matter.

Unless otherwise prohibited by law, each member of the council shall receive the same per diem, mileage and salary for attending and traveling to and from meetings, hearings and other activities necessary to the performance of the duties of the office in the same manner and amount as members of the Wyoming legislature. Council members who receive compensation from their employers for activities performed pursuant to this act shall not receive salary but shall receive mileage and per diem if they are not reimbursed by their employers.

Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms under this section shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.11; Laws 1977, ch. 132, § 1; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1980, ch. 64, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 71, § 1, effective February 19, 2019; 2019 ch. 133, § 1, effective February 27, 2019.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%)” for “four (4)” in the second sentence of (a).

The 2019 amendment,

in (d), substituted “the director or three (3) or more members” for “three (3) or more members.”

Laws 2019, ch. 71, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 19, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 5, makes the act effective on July 1, 1973.

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2, states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

EQC and DEQ were proper parties to a proceeding challenging new water quality rules. —

After the Wyoming Environmental Quality Council (EQC) adopted proposed revisions to Chapter 1 of the Wyoming Water Quality Rules and Regulations, petitioner special interest groups filed a petition to challenge the new rules and named the Wyoming Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) as respondent; the district court erred in dismissing the petition for lack of jurisdiction on the ground that the EQC was not named in the petition. The Supreme Court of Wyoming, held that both the EQC and the DEQ were both proper parties to this proceeding under the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

35-11-101

through

35-11-1904

; the EQC was an agency of the state government under Wyo. Stat. § 35-11-111(a).
Wyo. Outdoor Council v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2010 WY 20, 225 P.3d 1054,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2010).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Transporter liability under § 107(a)(4) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USC § 9607(a)(4)), 112 ALR Fed 49.